Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2902
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Physical Therapy Practice Act is to update and recodify statutes relating to the practice of physical therapy. Nothing in the act shall be construed to expand the scope of practice of physical therapy as it existed prior to July 14, 2006.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 119;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,363;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 995.